Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 2. Small Business Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program.

§ 10.1-1323.
Small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance assistance program.

There is hereby created within the Department a small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance assistance program to facilitate compliance by small business stationary sources with the provisions of the federal Clean Air Act. The program shall be administered by the Department.

Except as provided in subsections C and D of this section, any stationary source is eligible for the program that:

Is owned or operated by a person that employs 100 or fewer individuals;

Is a small business concern as defined in the federal Small Business Act;

Is not a major stationary source;

Does not emit fifty tons or more per year of any regulated pollutant; and

Emits less than seventy-five tons per year of all regulated pollutants.

Upon petition by a source owner, the Board may, after notice and opportunity for public comment, include as a small business stationary source for purposes of this section any stationary source which does not meet the criteria of subdivision B 3, B 4 or B 5 of this section but which does not emit more than 100 tons per year of all regulated pollutants.

The Board, in consultation with the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency and the Administrator of the United States Small Business Administration and after providing notice and opportunity for public hearing, may exclude as a small business stationary source for purposes of this article any category or subcategory of sources that the Board determines to have sufficient technical and financial capabilities to meet the requirements of the federal Clean Air Act without the application of this section.

History.

1992, c. 303.

§ 10.1-1324.
Office of Small Business Ombudsman created.

An Office of Small Business Ombudsman is hereby created within the Department.
The Office shall be headed by an ombudsman appointed by the Executive Director.
The Small Business Ombudsman shall provide direct oversight of the small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance assistance program.

History.

1992, c. 303.

§ 10.1-1325.
Small Business Environmental Compliance Advisory Panel created; membership; terms; compensation and expenses.

The Small Business Environmental Compliance Advisory Panel (the Panel) is hereby established as an advisory panel in the executive branch of state government. It shall be composed of seven members appointed for four years or until their successors have been appointed. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. Appointments shall be made in compliance with the Clean Air Act pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7661f, as amended, as follows:

Two members, who are not owners, or representatives of owners, of small business stationary sources, appointed by the Governor to represent the general public;

Two members appointed by the House of Delegates who are owners, or who represent owners, of small business stationary sources (one member each by the Speaker of the House of Delegates and Minority Leader of the House of Delegates);

Two members appointed by the Senate who are owners, or who represent owners, of small business stationary sources (one member each by the Majority and Minority Leaders of the Senate); and

One member appointed by the Executive Director.Members of Panel shall receive no compensation for their service, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§ 2.2-2813 and 2.2-2825. The costs of expenses of the members shall be paid from such funds as may be available under Subchapter V (42 U.S.C. § 7661 et seq.) of the Clean Air Act, as amended.

History.

1992, c. 303; 2004, c. 1000.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 1000, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments or appointments to fill vacancies made after the effective date of this act shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 rewrote the first paragraph and added the last paragraph.

§ 10.1-1326.
Duties of the Advisory Board.

The Small Business Environmental Compliance Advisory Board shall:

Render advisory opinions concerning the effectiveness of the Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program, difficulties encountered, and degree and severity of enforcement;

Make periodic reports to the General Assembly and the Administrator of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency concerning the compliance of the State Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program with the requirements of the federal Paperwork Reduction Act, the federal Regulatory Flexibility Act, and the federal Equal Access to Justice Act;

Review information for small business stationary sources to ensure that such information is understandable by the layperson; and

Develop and disseminate reports and advisory opinions through the Office of Small Business Ombudsman.

History.

1992, c. 303.